vi: Cấu hình tín hiệu âm thanh: Cân bằng; Kỹ thuật số (SPDIF); Đơn âm; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (có mic); Khác
bg-BG: Конфигурация на аудиосигнала: Балансиран; Цифров (SPDIF); Моно; Стерео (TRS); TRRS (с микрофон); Други
el: Διαμόρφωση σήματος ήχου: Ισορροπημένη; Ψηφιακό (SPDIF); Μονοφωνικός; Στερεοφωνικό (TRS); TRRS (με μικρόφωνο); Άλλο
es: Configuración de señal de audio: Equilibrado; Digital (SPDIF); Mono; Estéreo (TRS); TRRS (con micrófono); Otros
hu: Audiojel konfigurációja: Kiegyensúlyozott; Digitális (SPDIF); Monó; Sztereó (TRS); TRRS (mikrofonnal); Egyéb
lt-LT: Garso signalo konfigūracija: Tolygus svoris; Skaitmeninis (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (su mikrofonu); Kita
tr: Ses sinyal konfigürasyonu: Dengeli; Dijital (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (mikrofonlu); Diğer
it: Configurazione del segnale audio: Equilibrato; Digitale (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (con microfono); Altro
hr-HR: Konfiguracija audio signala: Uravnotežena; Digitalni (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (s mikrofonom); Ostalo
pt-PT: Configuração do sinal de áudio: Equilibrado; Digital (SPDIF); Mono; Estéreo (TRS); TRRS (com microfone); Outro
en: Audio signal configuration: Balanced; Digital (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (with mic); Other
zh-TW: 音訊訊號配置: 平衡; 數位 (SPDIF); 單; 立體聲 (TRS); TRRS (含麥克風); 其他
ro-RO: Configurație semnal audio: Echilibrat; Digital (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (cu microfon); Altele
ko: 오디오 신호 구성: 밸런스드; 디지털 (SPDIF); 모노; 스테레오 (TRS); TRRS (마이크 포함); 기타
ru: Конфигурация аудиосигнала: Сбалансированный; Цифровой (SPDIF); Одноканальный; Стерео (TRS); TRRS (с микрофоном); Другой
cs: Konfigurace audio signálu: Vyvážené; Digitální (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (s mikrofonem); Jiné
nb: Lydsignalkonfigurasjon: Balansert; Digital (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (med mikrofon); Annet
pl: Konfiguracja sygnału audio: Zrównoważony; Cyfrowy (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (z mikrofonem); Inne
fi: Äänisignaalin kokoonpano: Tasapainoinen; Digitaalinen (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (mikrofonilla); Muu
pt-BR: Configuração do sinal de áudio: Balanceado; Digital (SPDIF); Mono; Estéreo (TRS); TRRS (com microfone); Outro
sl-SI: Konfiguracija avdio signala: Uravnotežena; Digitalni (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (z mikrofonom); Drugo
sk-SK: Konfigurácia audio signálu: Vyvážený; Digitálny (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (s mikrofónom); Iné
ja: オーディオ信号構成: バランス; デジタル (SPDIF); モノ; ステレオ (TRS); TRRS (マイク付き); その他
sv: Ljudsignalkonfiguration: Balanserad; Digital (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (med mikrofon); Övrigt
fr: Configuration du signal audio: Équilibré; Numérique (SPDIF); Mono; Stéréo (TRS); TRRS (avec micro); Autre
da: Konfiguration af lydsignal: Balanceret; Digital (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (med mikrofon); Andet
th: การกำหนดค่าสัญญาณเสียง: สมดุล; ดิจิทัล (SPDIF); ทางเดียว; สเตอริโอ (TRS); TRRS (พร้อมไมค์); อื่นๆ
nl: Audiosignaalconfiguratie: Evenwichtig; Digitaal (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (met microfoon); Andere
zh-CN: 音频信号配置: 平衡; 数字 (SPDIF); Mono; 立体声 (TRS); TRRS（带麦克风）; 其他
de: Audiosignalkonfiguration: Ausgewogen; Digital (SPDIF); Mono; Stereo (TRS); TRRS (mit Mikrofon); Sonstiges